South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S209.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 14-23-1040 of the S.C. Code as amended by 1988 Act No. 678, Part IV, Section 3, relating to eligibility requirements for Probate Judges, is reenacted to read: Section 14-23-1040.  No person is eligible to hold the office of judge of probate who is not at the time of his election a citizen of the United States and of this State, has not attained the age of twenty-one years upon his election, has not become a qualified elector of the county in which he is to be a judge, and has not received a four-year bachelor's degree from an accredited post-secondary institution or if he has received no degree he must have four years' experience as an employee in a probate judge's office in this State. SECTION 2.  Section 14-23-1040 of the S.C. Code as reenacted by this act is enforceable beginning on July 1, 2026. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----